Arkansas, session 2025, SB573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends for this act to be remedial and to clarify
the law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 23, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional chapter to read as follows:
26-23-101. Definitions.
As used in this subtitle:
(1) "Cost approach" means an approach used to estimate the fair
market value of property based on the estimated current cost to construct
improvements plus the value of the land minus all forms of depreciation,
*JLL314*
03/28/2025 9:06:16 AM JLL314

SB573
including without limitation any loss in value caused by physical
deterioration, functional obsolescence, economic obsolescence, or any
combination of physical deterioration, functional obsolescence, or economic
obsolescence;
(2) "Economic life" means the period of time over which a
structure or component of property may reasonably be expected to be
profitably used for the purpose originally intended;
(3) "Economic obsolescence" or "external obsolescence" means the
loss in value of property caused by factors external to the property,
including without limitation the economics of an industry, increased costs or
loss of material or labor sources, lack of utilization, excess operating
costs, new legislation or regulation, changes in ordinances, reduced demand,
increased competition, inflation or interest rates, and other factors;
(4) "Fair market value", "market value", "true and full market
or actual value", "true market value", or "usual selling price of similar
property" means the value prescribed by Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, §
5, which is the most probable price expressed in terms of money that a
property will bring on the open market in a transaction between a willing and
knowledgeable seller and willing and knowledgeable buyer in an arms-length
transaction;
(5) "Functional obsolescence" or "internal obsolescence" means
the loss in value of property caused by the inefficiencies or inadequacies of
the property itself, resulting from changes in tastes, preferences, technical
innovations or improvements, market standards, or other factors;
(6) "Income approach" or "income and expense approach" means an
approach used to estimate the fair market value of property based on the
present value of the projected income stream ultimately attributable to the
taxable portion of the property;
(7) "Market approach" or "sales comparison approach" means an
approach used to estimate the fair market value of property based on
comparing sales of similar properties by identifying appropriate units of
comparison and making qualitative comparisons with or quantitative adjustment
to the sales prices of the comparable properties based on relevant market-
derived elements of comparison;
(8) "Physical deterioration" or "physical depreciation" means a
loss in value of property resulting from the using up or expiration of the
03/28/2025 9:06:16 AM JLL314

SB573
useful life or economic life of the property caused by ordinary wear and
tear, deterioration, physical stresses, the forces of nature, or other
factors;
(9) "Physical life" means the period of time over which a
structure or component of property may reasonably be expected to physically
exist before deteriorating or fatiguing to an unusable condition from
physical causes; and
(10) "Useful life" means the period of time over which a
structure or component of property may reasonably be expected to perform the
function for which the structure or component of property was designed.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.























03/28/2025 9:06:16 AM JLL314